src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv10_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dorg
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dorg
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dorg
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dorgar
    dorg+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dergur
    dorg+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dorgum
    dorg+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dorga
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dorgin
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dorgina
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dorgini
    dorg+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dorgarinnar
    dorg+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dergurnar
    dorg+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dorgunum
    dorg+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dorganna
